Tennessee, session 114, HB0186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-219(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "or the National Commission for Certification of Surgical Assistants or
their successors" and substituting "the National Commission for Certification of Surgical
Assistants, the American Board of Surgical Assistants, or their successors".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-219(b)(3), is amended by
deleting the language "by December 31, 2019".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0186
000859
- 1 -